generator/generator.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
# Authors: Nora Lötscher & Noëmi Aepli, Simon Clematide

################################################################################
# Generation of known words from lemmas and (under-)specified
# morphological features
################################################################################

# Requires the successful build of Grischun.fst
set show-flags ON
set obey-flags ON
#set print-space ON

################################################################################
# Generally useful stuff
################################################################################

# Main POS tags
define diacritizePOS [ #
	"+Adj" -> "@U.POS.+Adj@", 
	"+Adv" -> "@U.POS.+Adv@", 
	"+Art" -> "@U.POS.+Art@", 
	"+Conj" -> "@U.POS.+Conj@", 
	"+Dig" -> "@U.POS.+Dig@", 
	"+Initial" -> "@U.POS.+Initial@", 
	"+Interj" -> "@U.POS.+Interj@", 
	"+Let" -> "@U.POS.+Let@", 
	"+Noun" -> "@U.POS.+Noun@", 
	"+Num" -> "@U.POS.+Num@", 
	"+Prep" -> "@U.POS.+Prep@", 
	"+Pron" -> "@U.POS.+Pron@", 
	"+Prop" -> "@U.POS.+Prop@", 
	"+Punc" -> "@U.POS.+Punc@", 
	"+PUNCT" -> "@U.POS.+PUNCT@", 
	"+Rom" -> "@U.POS.+Rom@", 
	"+Subj" -> "@U.POS.+Subj@", 
	"+Verb" -> "@U.POS.+Verb@"
	];

# Subtypes for pronouns
define diacritizePOSPRON [ # 
	"+Dem" -> "@U.POSPRON.+Dem@", 
	"+Indef" -> "@U.POSPRON.+Indef@", 
	"+Interrog" -> "@U.POSPRON.+Interrog@", 
	"+Pers" -> "@U.POSPRON.+Pers@", 
	"+Poss" -> "@U.POSPRON.+Poss@", 
	"+Refl" -> "@U.POSPRON.+Refl@"
	];
# Subtypes for numerals
define diacritizePOSNUM [ # 
	"+Card" -> "@U.POSNUM.+Card@", 
	"+Dec" -> "@U.POSNUM.+Dec@", 
	"+Degree" -> "@U.POSNUM.+Degree@", 
	"+Ord" -> "@U.POSNUM.+Ord@", 
	"+Percent" -> "@U.POSNUM.+Percent@"
	];
define diacritizePOSPUNC [ # 
	"+Beg" -> "@U.POSPUNC.+Beg@", 
	"+End" -> "@U.POSPUNC.+End@", 
	"+Mid" -> "@U.POSPUNC.+Mid@"
	];


define diacritizeCASE [ #
	"+Acc" -> "@U.CASE.+Acc@", 
	"+AccDat" -> "@U.CASE.+AccDat@", 
	"+Nom" -> "@U.CASE.+Nom@"
	];

define diacritizeNUMBER [ #
	"+Pl" -> "@U.NUMBER.+Pl@", 
	"+Sg" -> "@U.NUMBER.+Sg@"
	];
define diacritizeGENDER [ #
	"+Masc" -> "@U.GENDER.+Masc@", 
	"+Fem" -> "@U.GENDER.+Fem@", 
	"+MF" -> "@U.GENDER.+MF@"
	];
define diacritizePERSON [ #
	"+1P" -> "@U.PERSON.+1P@", 
	"+2P" -> "@U.PERSON.+2P@", 
	"+3P" -> "@U.PERSON.+3P@"
	];
define diacritizeTENSEASP [ #
	"+PresInd" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+PresInd@", 
	"+PastPart" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+PastPart@", 
	"+Gerund" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+Gerund@", 
	"+Inf" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+Inf@", 
	"+Cond" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+Cond@", 
	"+Apo" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+Apo@",	
	"+Con" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+Con@", 
	"+ImpInd" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+ImpInd@", 
	"+Impv" -> "@U.TENSEASP.+Impv@" 
	] ;
define diacritizeDEGREE [ #
	"+Comp" -> "@U.DEGREE.+Comp@",
	"+Sup" -> "@U.DEGREE.+Sup@"
	];
define diacritizeMISC [ #
	"+Aton" -> "@U.MISC.+Aton@",
	"+Ton" ->  "@U.MISC.+Ton@",
	"+Prop" ->  "@U.MISC.+Prop@",
	"+Apo" ->  "@U.MISC.+Apo@"

	];	

define diacritizeAPO [ #
	"+Apo" ->  "@U.APO.+Apo@"

	];	

define diacritizeALL [ #
      diacritizePOS
	  .o. diacritizePOSPRON
		.o. diacritizePOSNUM
		 .o. diacritizePOSPUNC
		  .o. diacritizeCASE 
		   .o. diacritizeNUMBER 
			.o. diacritizeGENDER
			 .o. diacritizePERSON
			  .o. diacritizeTENSEASP
			   .o. diacritizeDEGREE
				.o.  diacritizeMISC
			   ];

define morphValues [ #
	 "+1P" 
	|"+2P" 
	|"+3P" 
	|"+Acc" 
	|"+AccDat" 
	|"+Adj" 
	|"+Adv" 
	|"+Apo" 
	|"+Apo" 
	|"+Art" 
	|"+Aton" 
	|"+Beg" 
	|"+Card" 
	|"+Comp" 
	|"+Cond" 
	|"+Conj" 
	|"+Con" 
	|"+Dec" 
	|"+Degree" 
	|"+Dem" 
	|"+Dig" 
	|"+End" 
	|"+Fem" 
	|"+Gerund" 
	|"+ImpInd" 
	|"+Impv" 
	|"+Indef" 
	|"+Inf" 
	|"+Initial" 
	|"+Interj" 
	|"+Interrog" 
	|"+Let" 
	|"+Masc" 
	|"+MF" 
	|"+Mid" 
	|"+Nom" 
	|"+Noun" 
	|"+Num" 
	|"+Ord" 
	|"+PastPart" 
	|"+Percent" 
	|"+Pers" 
	|"+Pl" 
	|"+Poss" 
	|"+Prep" 
	|"+PresInd" 
	|"+Pron" 
	|"+Prop" 
	|"+Prop" 
	|"+Punc" 
	|"+PUNCT" 
	|"+Refl" 
	|"+Rom" 
	|"+Sg" 
	|"+Subj" 
	|"+Sup" 
	|"+Ton" 
	|"+Verb" 
];

define optDeleteMorphValues [ morphValues (->) 0 ];

################################################################################
# Verbs
################################################################################

# Normalization of verb lemmas
define OrthoRule @"fstbinaries/OrthoRule.fst" ; 

# Inflected verbs (need a bit of normalization)
define Verb [ @"fstbinaries/Verb.fst" .o. OrthoRule ] ; 

define materializeVerb [ #	
		"@E.POS.+Verb@"  "+Verb"
		[
		  [
		  	[ "@R.TENSEASP.+PresInd@" "+PresInd"
			| "@R.TENSEASP.+ImpInd@" "+ImpInd"
			| "@R.TENSEASP.+Con@" "+Con" 

			| "@R.TENSEASP.+Impv@" "+Impv"
			| "@R.TENSEASP.+Cond@" "+Cond" 
			]
		 	[ "@R.PERSON.+1P@" "+1P" 
			| "@R.PERSON.+2P@" "+2P"
			| "@R.PERSON.+3P@" "+3P"
			]
			[ "@R.NUMBER.+Sg@" "+Sg"
			| "@R.NUMBER.+Pl@" "+Pl"
			]
		]
		|
			["@R.TENSEASP.+Gerund@" "+Gerund" ]
		|
			[
			"@R.TENSEASP.+PastPart@" "+PastPart" 
				[ "@R.GENDER.+Masc@" "+Masc"
				| "@R.GENDER.+Fem@"  "+Fem"
				]
				[ "@R.NUMBER.+Pl@" "+Pl"
				| "@R.NUMBER.+Sg@" "+Sg"
	 			 ]

			]
		]	
		
		 ];



#define materializeUpper [materializeUpperFinite ];
read regex [ Verb.i .o. diacritizePOS .o. diacritizeTENSEASP .o. diacritizePERSON .o. diacritizeNUMBER .o. diacritizeGENDER ] ;

twosided flag-diacritics

define VerbDiacritic ;

#read regex [ DIACRITIZED ] ; # .o. deleteFlagsLower ] ;
#twosided flag-diacritics
#define diacritizedUpper ;

#read regex diacritizedUpper ;
#twosided flag-diacritics
#print random-words

# 
read regex [ #
			[  VerbDiacritic  materializeVerb ]
			.o. optDeleteMorphValues
			 ] ;
twosided flag-diacritics

eliminate flags
compact sigma
save stack fstbinaries/verbgenerator.fst

#print sigma
#print random-words


define VerbGenerator ;


################################################################################
# Nouns (including proper nouns)
################################################################################

define Noun [ @"fstbinaries/Noun.fst" ] ; 

define materializeNoun [ #
	"@E.POS.+Noun@" "+Noun"
	[ "@R.GENDER.+Masc@" "+Masc"
	| "@R.GENDER.+Fem@"  "+Fem"
	]
	[ "@R.NUMBER.+Pl@" "+Pl"
	| "@R.NUMBER.+Sg@" "+Sg"
	  ]
	|
		"@R.POS.+Prop@" "+Prop"
	] ;

read regex [ Noun.i .o. diacritizePOS .o. diacritizeGENDER .o. diacritizeNUMBER ] ;

twosided flag-diacritics

define NounDiacritic ;

read regex [ #
			[  NounDiacritic  materializeNoun ]
			.o. optDeleteMorphValues
			 ] ;
twosided flag-diacritics

eliminate flags
compact sigma
save stack fstbinaries/noungenerator.fst

define NounGenerator;

################################################################################
#  Adjectives
################################################################################

define Adjective [ @"fstbinaries/Adjective.fst" .o. OrthoRule ] ; 

define materializeAdjective [ #
	"@E.POS.+Adj@" "+Adj"
	[
	 "@R.DEGREE.+Comp@" "+Comp"
	 | "@R.DEGREE.+Sup@" "+Sup"
	 | ["@D.DEGREE.+Sup@"  "@D.DEGREE.+Comp@"] 
	]
	[
	 "@R.GENDER.+Masc@" "+Masc"
	 | "@R.GENDER.+Fem@" "+Fem"
	 | "@R.GENDER.+MF@" "+MF"
	]
	[
	 "@R.NUMBER.+Pl@" "+Pl"
	 | "@R.NUMBER.+Sg@" "+Sg"
	]
	[
	 ["@R.APO.+Apo@" "+Apo"
	 | "@D.APO.+Apo@"]
	]

	] ;

define normalizeAsciiApo [
	[ ["`"|"´"|"’"]   -> "'" ||  _ "+Adj" $["+Apo"] ]
	] ;

read regex [ Adjective.i .o. diacritizePOS .o. diacritizeDEGREE .o. diacritizeGENDER .o. diacritizeNUMBER .o. diacritizeAPO] ;

twosided flag-diacritics

define AdjectiveDiacritic ;

read regex [ #
			[  AdjectiveDiacritic  materializeAdjective ]
			
			.o. optDeleteMorphValues
			 ] ;
twosided flag-diacritics

eliminate flags
compact sigma
print sigma

define AdjectiveGenerator ;

read regex normalizeAsciiApo.i .o. AdjectiveGenerator ;

save stack fstbinaries/adjectivegenerator.fst
define AdjectiveGenerator ;
################################################################################
#  all
################################################################################

read regex [ #
			[
			 @"fstbinaries/adjectivegenerator.fst"
			  | @"fstbinaries/verbgenerator.fst"
				  | @"fstbinaries/noungenerator.fst"
			  ]
			];
sort out
save stack  fstbinaries/generator.fst



define Generator; 
